Massachusetts, session 194th, H3951.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of 225 CMR 24.03, as in effect as of the passage
of this act, no municipality that withdrew its local approval, as defined in subsection (a) of
section 84 of chapter 179 of the acts of 2022, for participation in the demonstration project
established pursuant to said section 84 shall be considered a prioritized community for the
purposes of demonstration project participation. Notwithstanding subsection (c) of said section
84, the department of energy resources shall admit to the demonstration project any municipality,
upon the municipality’s request by its chief executive officer, that received local approval and
submitted a home rule petition to the general court on the subject matter of said section 84 prior
to the initial promulgation of regulations by the department of energy resources pursuant to
subsection (f) of said section 84.
of 1